Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5509.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 202b. (1) Except as provided in subsection (2), an employer shall not enter into an agreement with an employee or former employee that prohibits the employee or former employee from disclosing either of the following: (a) A violation or suspected violation of this article. (b) Facts regarding a violation or suspected violation of this article. (2) Subsection (1) does not prohibit an employer from entering into an agreement described in subsection (1) if all of the following conditions are met: (a) The employer notifies the employee or former employee, in writing, of both of the following: (i) The prohibition in subsection (1). (ii) That the employee or former employee may retain, and has not less than 5 business days beginning on the date the employer provides the notice under this subdivision to retain, an attorney before entering into the agreement. (b) If the employee or former employee is not represented by an attorney, the employer gives the employee or former employee not less than 5 business days, beginning on the date the employer provides the notice required under subdivision (a), to retain an attorney before entering into the agreement. (c) The agreement releases the employee's or former employee's claim regarding a violation of this article. (d) The agreement is otherwise enforceable. (3) An agreement entered into in violation of this section is void. (4) This section applies to an agreement entered into, amended, extended, or renewed on or after the effective date of the amendatory act that added this section.